Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-571
Class III or IV school district; meetings; disorderly conduct; penalty.

Any person who refuses to withdraw from such meeting on being so ordered as provided in section 79-570 or who willfully disturbs such meeting shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IV, § 3, p. 346;

R.S.1913, § 6765;

C.S.1922, § 6306;

C.S.1929, § 79-403;

R.S.1943, § 79-403;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 93, p. 724;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 249;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-454;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 324.